Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 1. Definitions and Fiduciary Duties.

§ 64.2-1000.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.2; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1001.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.3; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1002.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.4; 2005, c. 935; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1003.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

2004, c. 639, § 55-277.4:1; 2009, c. 477; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.